California statutes. Financial Code
 is in violation of an order or injunction, as authorized by this division; or (6) the association refuses to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of the commissioner, the commissioner may, ex parte and without notice, appoint a conservator for the association.

(b) The conservator may be the commissioner, deputy commissioner or any other person.

(c) The conservator shall, upon appointment, immediately take possession of the books, records, and assets of every description of the association and shall take any further action as he or she may deem necessary to conserve the assets of the association pending further disposition of its business.

(d) Within six months of the date of appointment of the conservator, or within 12 months if the commissioner extends the six months’ period, the association shall
 be returned to its board of directors to be managed and operated as if no conservator had been appointed, or a receiver shall be appointed as provided in Section 8250.

(e) If the commissioner or a department employee is appointed conservator no additional compensation shall be paid, but if another person is appointed then the compensation of the conservator, as determined by the commissioner, shall be paid by the association.

(f) Any expenses of such conservatorship shall be paid out of the assets of the association and shall be a lien against association assets prior to any other lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 11, Sec. 1.   Effective April 14, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

8226.

Any conservator shall have all the rights, powers, and privileges possessed by the officers, directors, members and stockholders of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8227.

Except as authorized by the commissioner, the conservator shall not retain special counsel or other experts, incur any expense other than normal operating expenses, or liquidate assets except in the ordinary course of operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 17.5.)
-------------------------------------------

8228.

The directors and officers shall remain in office and the employees shall remain in their respective positions, but the conservator may remove any director, officer, or employee, provided the order of removal of a director or officer shall be approved in writing by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8229.

(a) While the association is in the charge of a conservator, savings account holders, borrowers, and other obligors of the association shall continue to make payments to the association in accordance with the terms and conditions of their contracts, and the conservator may permit savings account holders to withdraw their accounts from the association pursuant to the provisions of this division but shall not declare, credit, or distribute interest for savings accounts without prior approval of the commissioner.

(b) The conservator shall have power to accept savings
 accounts and additions to savings accounts, but any amounts received by the conservator may be segregated if the commissioner shall so order in writing. If so ordered, these amounts shall not be subject to offset and shall not be used to liquidate any indebtedness of the association existing at the time the conservator was appointed for it or any subsequent indebtedness incurred for the purposes of liquidating the indebtedness of the association existing at the time the conservator was appointed. 

(c) All expenses of the association during conservatorship shall be paid by the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 17.7.)
-------------------------------------------

8230.

Whenever a conservator has taken possession of the property and business of any association pursuant to this article, that association, within 10 days after the taking, if it deems itself aggrieved thereby, may apply to the superior court in the county in which the home office of the association is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after hearing and determination of the facts, may dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct the commissioner to surrender the property and business to that
 association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 21.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Receivership [8250. - 8254.]

8250.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any association (1) is in an impaired condition, (2) is engaging in practices that threaten to result in an impaired condition, or (3) is in violation of an order or injunction issued pursuant to this division, the commissioner may appoint a receiver for the association.

(b) The receiver may be the commissioner, deputy commissioner or any other person.

(c) The receiver shall, upon appointment, immediately take possession of the books, records, and assets of every
 description of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

8251.

(a) In the case of an insured association, the appointment by the commissioner of a receiver under this article shall constitute an official determination of a public authority of this state pursuant to which a receiver is appointed for the purpose of liquidation as contemplated by and within the meaning of subdivision (d) of Section 401 of the National Housing Act of 1934 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701 et seq.), as amended.

(b) A receiver shall have all the powers and authority of a conservator plus the power to liquidate, and shall have any other powers and authority that are
 expressed in an order of a court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

8252.

If the commissioner or a department employee is appointed receiver, no additional compensation shall be paid, but if another person is appointed, then the compensation of the receiver, as determined by the court, shall be paid from the assets of the association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8253.

If the association is an institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be tendered appointment as receiver or coreceiver. If it accepts the appointment, it may, nevertheless, make loans on the security of or purchase at public or private sale any part or all of the assets of the association of which it is receiver or coreceiver, provided the loan or purchase is approved by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

8254.

Whenever a receiver has taken possession of the property and business of any association pursuant to this article, that association, within 10 days after the taking, if it deems itself aggrieved thereby, may apply to the superior court in the county in which the home office of the association is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after hearing and determination of the facts, may dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct the commissioner to surrender the property and business to that
 association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Federal Associations [8500. - 8501.]

8500.

(a) Every federal association and the holders of stock, shares, share accounts, savings accounts, and certificate accounts issued by any federal association have all the rights, powers, and privileges, and are entitled to the same exemptions and immunities granted, respectively, to associations organized under the laws of this state and to the holders of their stock, membership accounts, and savings accounts.

(b) This section is in addition and supplemental to any provision that, by specific reference, is applicable to federal associations and
 their members or stockholders.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 16.   Effective September 26, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

8501.

No director of a federal association shall be liable for monetary damages to the federal association, its stockholders or members, based upon the laws of this state, to the extent that the stockholders, or in case of a mutual federal association the members of the federal association, adopt a resolution limiting liability. The resolution shall not eliminate or limit the liability of directors for any acts or omissions or transactions from which directors of a corporation may not be relieved of liability as set forth in the exception to paragraph (10) of Section 204 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 730, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Fees [9000. - 9001.]

9000.

Associations shall pay all fees required by this division to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 566.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

(a) Except where otherwise expressly provided, the commissioner shall prescribe by regulation the amount of each fee expressly required by the provisions of this division, including both existing provisions and provisions that are added by future enactments.

(b) The commissioner may require, and prescribe by regulation the amount of a fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), for filing any application that requires the commissioner’s approval where a fee is not expressly required by the provisions of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Foreign (National) Savings Companies [10000. - 10009.]

10000.

Terms not expressly defined in this chapter have the meaning given in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5000) or as the commissioner may provide by regulation. For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “California savings association” means either (1) an association or (2) a foreign association or successor thereof that was licensed to do the business of an association in California on September 15, 1935.

(b) “Foreign holding company”
 means a savings and loan holding company as defined in Section 10 of the Home Owners Loan Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1467a) or bank holding company as defined in Section 3 of the federal Bank Holding Company Act, as amended, (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1841 et seq.), which savings and loan or bank holding company (1) has its principal place of deposits outside of California and (2) does not control a subsidiary California savings association or a subsidiary federal association with, or a subsidiary foreign savings association with, an authorized home or branch office in California at which accounts may lawfully be opened and deposits may lawfully be accepted.

(c) “Foreign savings association” means an insured institution other than a California savings association and other than a federal association.

(d) “Insured institution” means an entity: (1) that is organized and licensed as a
 savings association, savings and loan association, or savings bank under the laws of another state of the United States and the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or (2) that is chartered by the Office of Thrift Supervision. However, “insured institution” does not include any savings bank of the type defined in Section 3(g) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(g)).

(e) The “principal place of deposits” of an entity is that state in which the total deposits of all of that entity’s depository operations and those of its affiliates are largest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 176, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

(a) No person, other than a California savings association or other person authorized by this division, shall do any business of an association.

(b) No foreign savings association may control a California savings association.

(c) No foreign holding company may control a California savings association. 

(d) The commissioner shall obtain an injunction or take other action necessary to prevent any person from unlawfully
 doing any business of an association in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 19.   Effective September 26, 1987.   Section operative January 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 10009.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

Notwithstanding Section 10001, and subject to Section 10003, on and after January 1, 1991, a foreign savings association may conduct the business of an association in California or may acquire control of a California savings association, and a foreign holding company may acquire control of a California savings association; provided that, if the commissioner determines that the laws, court decisions, or practices of the jurisdiction under which the foreign savings association is incorporated or, in the case of a foreign holding company, the holding company’s principal place of deposits, would operate to prohibit, restrict,
 condition, or otherwise limit a California savings association from conducting the business of, or acquiring control of, a savings association in the relevant jurisdiction pursuant to the laws, court decisions, or practices of that jurisdiction, a similar prohibition, restriction, condition, or limitation to be prescribed by regulation or order of the commissioner shall apply in California to the foreign savings association or foreign holding company.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10001 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 18.   Effective September 26, 1987.   Section operative January 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 10009.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

No foreign savings association may conduct the business of an association in California, and no foreign savings association or foreign holding company may acquire control of a California savings association, without the written approval of the commissioner. A foreign savings association or foreign holding company shall submit to the commissioner a written application for approval in the form and shall pay such fees as the commissioner prescribes. The foreign savings association or foreign holding company shall submit with the application such information, data, and records as the commissioner may require in order to make his or
 her determination. The commissioner may issue such regulations as he or she deems to be appropriate to preserve the public interest and integrity of the state’s savings association system and to protect the interests of savings account holders, borrowers, and stockholders resident in this state. The commissioner may make arrangements with the supervisory officials of other states for reciprocal examination of California savings associations, foreign savings associations and foreign holding companies, and the imposition of fees therefor and may condition his or her approval pursuant to this chapter upon the existence of those arrangements.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10002 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 20.   Effective September 26, 1987.   Section operative January 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 10009.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

Except as expressly provided for in this chapter, any person who, as principal, agent, salesperson, solicitor, or in any other capacity, solicits or conducts in this state the business of selling, disposing of, taking, or soliciting savings accounts of any foreign savings association that has not complied with all the requirements of this chapter, is guilty of a public offense punishable by
 imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 106.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

For the purposes of this article and any other law of this state prohibiting, limiting, or regulating the doing of business or the selling, taking, or solicitation of savings accounts in this state by foreign savings associations or foreign corporations, any federally insured foreign savings association subject to state or federal supervision, which by law is subject to periodic examination by that supervisory authority and to a requirement of periodic audit, and any broker-dealer registered in accordance with the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of
 1934 and the Corporate Securities Law of 1968, and any partner, officer, director, branch manager, or person performing similar functions, and employees of that broker-dealer, shall not be considered to be doing business or selling, taking, or soliciting savings accounts in this state by reason of engaging in the following:

(a) (1) Any of the activities specified in subdivision (d) of Section 191 of the Corporations Code, or (2) the advertising or solicitation of savings accounts in this state by a federally insured foreign savings association through the media of the mail, radio, television, magazines, newspapers, or any other media that are published or circulated within this state, except through or as a result of telemarketing, provided that the advertising or solicitation as a whole is accurate and does not create a misleading impression even though statements considered separately are literally accurate. A federally
 insured foreign savings association shall not sell, take or solicit savings accounts through telemarketing by use of the telephone or telephone transceiving equipment, or through the use of an automatic dial-announcing device as defined in Section 2871 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) The offering by a registered broker-dealer of, or the placement by a registered broker-dealer of a customer’s funds into, a savings account at a federally insured foreign savings association chartered under the laws of a state in which broker-dealers make available savings accounts of associations chartered under the laws of this state, provided that (1) any advertising, offering material, or solicitation as a whole is accurate and does not create a misleading impression even though statements considered separately are literally accurate and (2) the savings accounts of the federally insured foreign savings association are rated “investment grade” by either
 Standard & Poor’s Corporation or Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. based upon the foreign savings association’s ability to repay the savings accounts independent of federal deposit insurance benefits.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1206, Sec. 3) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 469, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

Except as provided by regulation, this division applies to a foreign savings association or its holding company as if business conducted in this state were that of a California savings association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 24.   Effective September 26, 1987.   Section operative January 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 10009.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

If a foreign savings association is controlled by a foreign holding company, the requirements under this chapter applicable to both a foreign savings association and foreign holding company are required to be met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 25.   Effective September 26, 1987.   Section operative January 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 10009.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 1991.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10003 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 21.   Effective September 26, 1987.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Chapter 10 (added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1057), commencing with Section 10000.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. CHECK SELLERS, BILL PAYERS, AND PRORATERS [12000. - 12404.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [12000. - 12005.]

12000.

This division is known and may be cited as the Check Sellers, Bill Payers and Proraters Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

A check seller is a person: (a) who, for compensation, engages, in whole or in part, in the business of selling checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose, or receiving money as agent of an obligor for the purpose of paying to a person other than the check seller bills, invoices, or accounts of such obligor, or (b) who, without direct compensation and not as an authorized agent for a utility company, accepts money for the purpose of forwarding it to others in payment of utility bills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.1.

A prorater is a person who, for compensation, engages in whole or in part in the business of receiving money or evidences thereof for the purpose of distributing the money or evidences thereof among creditors in payment or partial payment of the obligations of the debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 999.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.2.

A business agent, for the purpose of this division is a person who engages in business as a prorater as defined in Section 12002.1 as an incident to the business of advising, counseling, or directing persons in their investments, and in the organization and management of their affairs under an exclusive contract, the primary purpose of which is not the liquidation of existing indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1506.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any deputy, investigator, auditor, or any other person employed by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 110.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12004.

“Licensee” means any individual or corporation licensed by the commissioner to engage in the business of a business agent, and any corporation licensed by the commissioner to engage in the business of selling checks, drafts or money orders, or of receiving money as agent of an obligor for the purpose of paying bills, invoices or accounts of such obligor or to accept money in payment of utility bills except as an authorized agent for a utility company pursuant to the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12005.

“Mobile unit” means a vehicle or other movable means from which the business of selling checks, drafts, or money orders is conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 660, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Application of Division [12100. - 12108.]

12100.

This division does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any person, or his or her authorized agent, doing business under license and authority of the Commissioner of Financial Institutions under Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) or under any law of this state or of the United States relating to banks, trust companies, building or savings associations, industrial loan companies, personal property brokers, credit unions, title insurance companies or underwritten title companies, as defined
 in Section 12402 of the Insurance Code, escrow agents subject to Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000), or finance lenders subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000).

(b) (1) Any person licensed under Chapter 14A (commencing with Section 1851) of Division 1 or any agent of the person, when selling any traveler’s check, as defined in Section 1852, which is issued by the person.

(2) Any person licensed under Division 16 (commencing with Section 33000) or any agent of the person, when selling any payment instrument, as defined in Section 33059, which is issued by the person.

(c) The services of a person licensed to practice law in this state, when the person renders services in the course of his or her practice as an attorney-at-law, and the fees and disbursements of the person,
 whether paid by the debtor or other person, are not charges or costs and expenses regulated by or subject to the limitations of this chapter. These fees and disbursements shall not be shared, directly or indirectly, with the prorater or check seller.

(d) Any transaction in which money or other property is paid to a “joint control agent” for disbursal or use in payment of the cost of labor, materials, services, permits, fees, or other items of expense incurred in construction of improvements upon real property.

(e) A merchant-owned credit or creditors association, or a member-owned, member-controlled, or member-directed association whose principal function is that of servicing the community as a reporting agency.

(f) Any agency or service subject to Title 2.91 (commencing with Section 1812.500) of Part 4 of Division 3
 of the Civil Code, when providing services under that title.

(g) Any person licensed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, when acting in any capacity for which he or she is licensed under that part.

(h) A common law or statutory assignment for the benefit of creditors or the operation or liquidation of property or a business enterprise under supervision of a creditor’s committee.

(i) The services of a person licensed as a certified public accountant or a public accountant in this state, when the person renders services in the course of his or her practice as a certified public accountant or a public accountant, and the fees and disbursements of the person, whether paid by the debtor or other person, are not charges or costs and expenses regulated by or
 subject to the limitations of this chapter. These fees and disbursements shall not be shared, directly or indirectly, with the prorater or check seller.

(j) Any person licensed under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1800) of Division 1 or any agent of the person, when selling any check or draft that is drawn by the person and is of the type described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1800.5.

(k) Any group of banks each of which is organized under the laws of a nation other than the United States and one or more of which are licensed by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1750) of Chapter 13.5 of Division 1, or any agent of the group, when selling any foreign currency traveler’s check, as defined in Section 1852, issued by the group. Each bank that is a member of the group is jointly and severally liable to pay the
 foreign currency traveler’s check.

(l) Any transaction of the type described in Section 1854.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.5.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 778.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this division, or who willfully violates any rule or order under this division, shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment, but no person
 may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order unless he or she had knowledge of the rule or order. Conviction under this section shall not preclude the commissioner from exercising the authority provided in Section 12400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 107.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.1.

A licensee under this division or any person engaged in the same type of business as licensed under this division whether said person is licensed or not shall be deemed to be an agent as defined under Sections 506 and 506a of the Penal Code and subject to the penalties under said sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

Whenever in the opinion of the commissioner any person is engaged in business as a check seller as defined in this division without a license from the commissioner, or any person or licensee is violating any provision of this division, the commissioner may order the person or licensee to desist and to refrain from engaging in such business or further violating this division. If, after an order has been served, a request for a hearing is filed in writing within 30 days of the date of service of the order by the person to whom the order was directed, a hearing shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that chapter. Unless the hearing is commenced within 15 business days after the request for a hearing is filed or the person affected consents to a later date, the order is rescinded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 110, Sec. 1.   (AB 1113)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

A nonprofit community service organization that meets all of the following criteria shall be exempt from any requirements imposed on proraters pursuant to this division:

(a) The nonprofit community service organization incorporates in this state or any other state as a nonprofit corporation and operates pursuant to either the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code or the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(b) The nonprofit community service organization limits its membership to retailers, lenders in the consumer credit field, educators,
 attorneys, social service organizations, employer and employee organizations, and related groups that serve educational, benevolent, fraternal, religious, charitable, social, or reformatory purposes.

(c) The nonprofit community service organization has as its principal functions all of the following:

(1) Consumer credit education.

(2) Counseling on consumer credit problems and family budgets via in-person, telephone, and virtual communication.

(3) Arranging or administering debt management plans. “Debt management plan” means a method of paying debtor’s obligations in installments on a monthly basis.

(4) Arranging or administering debt settlement plans. “Debt settlement plans” means a method of paying debtor’s obligations in a negotiated amount to each creditor on a one-time basis.

(d) (1) The nonprofit community service organization receives from a debtor no more than the following maximum amounts to offset the organization’s actual and necessary expenses for the services described in subdivision (c):

(A) For education and counseling combined in connection with debt management or debt settlement services, a one-time sum not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(B) For debt management plans, a sum not to exceed 15 percent of the money disbursed monthly, or seventy-five dollars ($75) per month, whichever is less.

(C) For debt settlement plans, a sum not to exceed 15 percent of the amount of the
 debt forgiven for negotiated debt settlement plans.

(2) A nonprofit community service organization shall not require any upfront payments or deposits on debt settlement plans and may require payment of fees only once the debt has been successfully settled.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a household shall be considered one debtor.

(4) The fees allowed pursuant to this subdivision shall be the only fees that may be charged by a nonprofit community service organization for any services related to a debt management plan or a debt settlement plan.

(e) The nonprofit community service organization maintains and keeps
 current and accurate books, records, and accounts relating to its business in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and stores them in a readily accessible place for a period of no less than five years from the end of the fiscal year in which any transactions occurred.

(f) The nonprofit community service organization deposits any money received from a debtor for the services described in subdivision (c) in a noninterest-bearing trust account in a federally insured state or federal bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union, which account is maintained specifically for purposes of administering a debt management plan or debt settlement plan. The nonprofit community service organization shall provide
 to the commissioner both of the following before engaging in business in this state and claiming this exemption:

(1) (A) A written notice with the name, address, and telephone number of the bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union where the trust account is maintained, and the name of the account and the account number.

(B) The account information required by this paragraph shall be kept confidential pursuant to the laws governing disclosure of public records, including the California Public Records Act, Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the rules adopted thereunder.

(2) An irrevocable written consent providing that upon the commissioner taking possession of the property and business of the nonprofit community service organization, all books, records, property, and business, including trust accounts and any other accounts holding debtors’ funds, shall be immediately turned over to the commissioner or receiver appointed pursuant to this division. The consent shall be signed by the nonprofit community service organization and the bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union where the trust account is
 maintained. The consent shall be binding upon the nonprofit community service organization and the bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union, and any objection to it
 shall be raised pursuant to the laws of the state and only in the forum in which the proceeding to take possession or appointment of the receiver has been filed. The nonprofit community service organization and the bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union shall further consent to the jurisdiction of the commissioner for the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under Sections 12105 and 12106 or any other provision of this division. The consent required by this paragraph shall include the name, title, and signature of an official of the bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union holding the authority to consent on behalf of that institution, and the name, title, and signature of the chief executive officer or
 president of the nonprofit community service organization.

(g) (1) The nonprofit community service organization maintains at all times a surety bond in the amount of
 one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) issued by an insurer licensed in this state.

(2) The bond required by this
 subdivision shall be conditioned upon all of the following:

(A) The obligor faithfully conforming to and abiding by the provisions of this section.

(B) The obligor honestly and faithfully applying all funds received.

(C) The obligor honestly and faithfully performing all obligations and undertakings required under this section.

(D) The obligor paying to the state and to any person all money that becomes due and owing to the state or to any person owed by the obligor of the bond.

(h) The nonprofit community service organization reports all of the following to
 the debtor at least once every three months, or upon the debtor’s request, for any debt management plan or debt settlement plan:

(1) Total amount received from the debtor.

(2) Total amount paid to each creditor.

(3) Total amount any creditor has agreed to accept as payment in full on any debt owed by the debtor.

(4) Any amount paid to the organization by the debtor.

(5) Any amount held in reserve.

(i) The nonprofit community service organization submits to the commissioner, at the organization’s expense, an audit report containing audited financial statements covering the calendar year or, if the organization has an
 established fiscal year, then for that fiscal year, within 120 days after the close of the calendar or fiscal year.

(j) The nonprofit community service organization submits with the annual financial statements required under subdivision (i) a declaration that conforms to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, is executed by an official authorized by the board of the organization, and that states that the organization complies with this section. The annual financial statements shall also include a separate written statement that identifies the name, address, contact person, and telephone number of the organization.

(k) The nonprofit community service organization maintains accreditation by an independent accrediting organization, including either the Council on Accreditation or the International Standards Organization, with sector certification.

(l) The nonprofit community service organization does not engage in any act or practice in violation of Section 17200 or 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.

(m) The nonprofit community service organization inserts the following statement, in not less than 10-point type, in its debt management plan and debt settlement plan agreements: “Complaints related to this agreement may be directed to the California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation. This nonprofit community service organization has adopted best practices for debt management plans and debt settlement plans, and a copy will be provided upon request.”

(n) The nonprofit community service organization adopts and implements on a continuous basis policies or procedures of best practices that are designed to prevent improper debt management
 or debt settlement practices and prevent theft and misappropriation of funds. Failure to do
 any of the following shall constitute improper debt management or debt settlement practices, as applicable:

(1) Obtain and maintain counselor certification conducted by a nationally recognized third-party certification program that certifies that all of the
 organization’s counselors receive proper training